src/pron-ciw-lex.txt
LEXICON Pronoun 

Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
!Reflexive ;

LEXICON Personal

niin+Pron+Pers+1Sg:niin # "I, me" ;
giin+Pron+Pers+2Sg:giin # "you" ;
wiin+Pron+Pers+3Sg:wiin # "he, she" ;
niinawind+Pron+Pers+1Pl:niinawind # "we (exc.); we exclusive" ;
giinawind+Pron+Pers+12Pl:giinawind # "we (inc.); we inclusive" ;
giinawaa+Pron+Pers+2Pl:giinawaa # "you pl" ;
wiinawaa+Pron+Pers+3Pl:wiinawaa # "they" ;

LEXICON Demonstrative
 
wa'aw+Pron+Dem+AN+Sg:wa'aw # "this" ;
wa'aw+Pron+Dem+AN+Pl:ongow # "this" ;
wa'aw+Pron+Dem+IN+Sg:o'ow #  "this" ;
wa'aw+Pron+Dem+IN+Pl:onow #  "this" ;

a'aw+Pron+Dem+AN+Sg:wa'aw # "that" ;
a'aw+Pron+Dem+AN+Pl:ingiw # "that" ;
a'aw+Pron+Dem+IN+Sg:i'iw #  "that" ;
a'aw+Pron+Dem+IN+Pl:iniw #  "that" ;


awedi+Pron+Dem+AN+Sg:awedi # "that over there" ;
awedi+Pron+Dem+AN+Pl:ingiwedig # "that over there" ;
awedi+Pron+Dem+IN+Sg:iwedi #  "that over there" ;
awedi+Pron+Dem+IN+Pl:iniwedin #  "that over there" ;



!LEXICON Reflexive
!K ;
